Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB398.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 309. Online raffles by fire companies.(a) Online raffles.--A fire company that has a valid small games of chance license issued under section 307 may conduct raffles over the Internet subject to the following:(1) An individual may purchase a ticket for the raffles only by means of a debit or credit card.(2) The fire company may not conduct more than two 123456789101112131415161718192021 raffles per year under this section.(b) Expiration.--This section shall expire December 31, 2026.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0398PN0345 - 2 - 1234